North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-24 Miscellaneous [Repealed]

4-24-01.
Willful damage to threshing machine — Consequential injury to person — Penalty — Civil action for damages. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

4-24-02.
Injuring standing crops, grain, fruits, and vegetables — Misdemeanor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

4-24-03.
Injuring fruits, melons, or flowers in the daytime — Punishment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

4-24-04.
Injuring fruits, melons, or flowers in the nighttime — Punishment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

4-24-05.
Injuring trees — Punishment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

4-24-06.
Sale of chemically treated grain — Misdemeanor. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 91, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 4-2406; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 20; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-24-07.
Agricultural promotion groups — Collocation and assistance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 68, § 1.

4-24-08.
North Dakota winter show — Official site. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 98, § 1; 1997, ch. 70, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-24-09.
Agricultural commodity assessments funds — Investment income allocation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 97, § 1; 1989, ch. 76, § 9; 1989, ch. 85, § 1; 1993, ch. 51, § 8; 1997, ch. 63, § 11; 2001, ch. 69, § 1; 2009, ch. 191, § 14; 2011, ch. 61, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-24-10.
Agricultural commodity promotion groups to report to legislative assembly — Report contents. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 51, § 9; 1995, ch. 66, § 3; 1997, ch. 63, § 12; 1999, ch. 50, § 3; 2001, ch. 69, § 2; 2009, ch. 191, § 15; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-24-11.
North Dakota agricultural hall of fame — Establishment — Induction. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 70, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-24-11.1.
North Dakota agricultural hall of fame committee — Members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 70, § 2; 2001, ch. 70, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-24-12.
Purple coneflowers (Echinacea purpurea or Echinacea angustifolia) — Unauthorized removal — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 60, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-24-13.
Genetically modified seed — Patent infringement — Sampling — Mediation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 71, § 1; 2011, ch. 83, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.